Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.830

Funding, services, and outcomes for children and youth who are neglected, delinquent, or at risk—Report.

(1)(a) Beginning July 1, 2022, and every three years thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report on the funding and services provided in support of youth pursuant to Washington's every student succeeds act consolidated plan, Title I, part D: Prevention and intervention programs for children and youth who are neglected, delinquent, or at risk, and the education outcomes resulting from the funding and provided services.

(b) The purpose of the report is to inform the legislature of progress toward the goals established in the consolidated plan and provide the legislature with the opportunity to determine whether subsequent legislation should be enacted to ensure the education needs of youth and postresident youth.

(2) Reports required by this section, which must delineate the recipients of the federal funds and how they are being used to support the education needs of youth and postresident youth, must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(3) For purposes of this section, "postresident youth" and "youth" have the same meanings as in RCW 28A.190.005.

[ 2021 c 164 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.